Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB818.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 241.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each county administrator shall have the same duties and functions regarding local
license:
(a) Applications and renewals as the department with respect to state licenses;
and
(b) [. Each county administrator shall have the same duties and functions
regarding local license ]Penalization as the board with respect to state license
penalization.
(2) If any city appoints its own administrator under KRS 241.160, the county
administrator in that county shall have jurisdiction over only that portion of the
county that[which] lies outside the corporate limits of that city, unless the city does
not have an adequate police force.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/27/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed